Louisiana, session 2026, SB214.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The heading of Part I of Chapter 13 of Title 38 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 38:2502 is hereby enacted to
read as follows:
PART I. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE LOUISIANA
WILDLIFE AND FISHERIES COMMISSION GENERAL PROVISIONS
* * *
§2502. Limitation of liability for flood mitigation preparations
A.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no
political subdivision created pursuant to this Chapter and authorized to
establish, construct, operate, and maintain freshwater systems, nor any officer,
employee, or agent thereof, shall be liable for any damage caused by or resulting
from any act or omission in reducing or ceasing pumping operations or
operating water control structures for the purpose of lowering water levels
pursuant to an operational plan implemented in preparation for a weather
event forecasted by the National Weather Service or the Governor's Office of
Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness.
(2) The limitation of liability provided in this Section shall not apply to
acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
B. The provisions of this Section shall apply only to a political
subdivision whose territorial jurisdiction encompasses four parishes, at least
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 214 ENROLLED
one of which has a population of not less than one hundred forty-five thousand
and not more than three hundred fifty thousand persons according to the most
recent federal decennial census.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.